North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50A. Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act and Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.
Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 50A-350.
Short title.

This Article may be cited as the “Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-351.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Adult. — An individual who is at least 18 years of age or an emancipated minor.

Caretaking authority. — The right to live with and care for a child on a day-to-day basis, including physical custody, parenting time, right to access, and visitation.

Child. — An (i) unemancipated individual who has not attained 18 years of age or (ii) adult son or daughter by birth or adoption who is the subject of an existing court order concerning custodial responsibility.

Close and substantial relationship. — A relationship in which a significant bond exists between a child and a nonparent.

Court. — An entity authorized under the laws of this State to establish, enforce, or modify a decision regarding custodial responsibility.

Custodial responsibility. — A comprehensive term that includes any and all powers and duties relating to caretaking authority and decision-making authority for a child. The term includes custody, physical custody, legal custody, parenting time, right to access, visitation, and the authority to designate limited contact with a child.

Decision-making authority. — The power to make important decisions regarding a child, including decisions regarding the child’s education, religious training, health care, extracurricular activities, and travel. The term does not include day-to-day decisions that necessarily accompany a grant of caretaking authority.

Deploying parent. — A service member, who is deployed or has been notified of impending deployment, and is (i) a parent of a child or (ii) an individual other than a parent who has custodial responsibility of a child.

Deployment. — The movement or mobilization of a service member to a location for more than 90 days, but less than 18 months, pursuant to an official order that (i) is designated as unaccompanied; (ii) does not authorize dependent travel; or (iii) otherwise does not permit the movement of family members to that location.

Family member. — A sibling, aunt, uncle, cousin, stepparent, or grandparent of a child, and an individual recognized to be in a familial relationship with a child.

Limited contact. — The opportunity for a nonparent to visit with a child for a limited period of time. The term includes authority to take the child to a place other than the residence of the child.

Nonparent. — An individual other than a deploying parent or other parent.

Other parent. — An individual who, in common with a deploying parent, is (i) the parent of a child or (ii) an individual other than a parent with custodial responsibility of a child.

Record. — Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Return from deployment. — The conclusion of a service member’s deployment as specified in uniformed service orders.

Service member. — A member of a uniformed service.

State. — A state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Uniformed service. — Service which includes (i) the active and reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard of the United States; (ii) the Merchant Marine, the commissioned corps of the Public Health Service, or the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the United States; or (iii) the National Guard.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-352.
Remedies for noncompliance.

In addition to other relief provided under the laws of this State, if a court finds that a party to a proceeding under this Article has acted in bad faith or intentionally failed to comply with the requirements of this Article or a court order issued under this Article, the court may assess reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs against the opposing party and order other appropriate relief.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-353.
Jurisdiction.

A court may issue an order regarding custodial responsibility under this Article only if the court has jurisdiction pursuant to Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (UCCJEA) under Article 2 of this Chapter. If the court has issued a temporary order regarding custodial responsibility pursuant to Part 3 of this Article, for purposes of the UCCJEA, the residence of the deploying parent is not changed by reason of the deployment during the deployment.

If a court has issued a permanent order regarding custodial responsibility before notice of deployment and the parents modify that order temporarily by agreement pursuant to Part 2 of this Article, for purposes of the UCCJEA, the residence of the deploying parent is not changed by reason of the deployment.

If a court in another state has issued a temporary order regarding custodial responsibility as a result of impending or current deployment, for purposes of the UCCJEA, the residence of the deploying parent is not changed by reason of the deployment.

This section does not prohibit the exercise of temporary emergency jurisdiction by a court under the UCCJEA.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-354.
Notice required of deploying parent.

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a deploying parent shall, in a record, notify the other parent of a pending deployment not later than seven days after receiving notice of deployment unless the deploying parent is reasonably prevented from notifying the other parent by the circumstances of service. If the circumstances of service prevent notification within seven days, the notification shall be made as soon as reasonably possible thereafter.

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, each parent shall, in a record, provide the other parent with a plan for fulfilling that parent’s share of custodial responsibility during deployment as soon as reasonably possible after receiving notice of deployment under subsection (a) of this section.

If an existing court order prohibits disclosure of the address or contact information of the other parent, a notification of deployment under subsection (a) of this section, or notification of a plan for custodial responsibility during deployment under subsection (b) of this section, may be made only to the issuing court. If the address of the other parent is available to the issuing court, the court shall forward the notification to the other parent. The court shall keep confidential the address or contact information of the other parent.

Notice in a record is not required if the parents are living in the same residence and there is actual notice of the deployment or plan.

In a proceeding regarding custodial responsibility between parents, a court may consider the reasonableness of a parent’s efforts to comply with this section.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-355.
Notification required for change of address.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual to whom custodial responsibility has been assigned or granted during deployment under Part 2 or Part 3 of this Article shall notify the deploying parent and any other individual with custodial responsibility of any change of mailing address or residence until the assignment or grant is terminated. The individual shall provide the notice to any court that has issued an existing custody or child support order concerning the child.

If an existing court order prohibits disclosure of the address or contact information of an individual to whom custodial responsibility has been assigned or granted, a notification of change of mailing address or residence under subsection (a) of this section may be made only to the court that issued the order. The court shall keep confidential the mailing address or residence of the individual to whom custodial responsibility has been assigned or granted.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§§ 50A-356 through 50A-359.

Reserved for future codification purposes.